Mississippi, session 2026, HB4108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Leake County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with purchasing certain new equipment for the constables of the county, and training and certification for use of the equipment, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................... $ 35,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated under Section 1 of this act shall be used to purchase Axon Body Camera starter bundles, Taser 10 Certification Pro and the MSWIN mobile radio, and training and certification for use of the equipment, for the constables of the county. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.